Mississippi, session 2026, HB1683.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The following words shall have the meanings described herein: (a)  "Foreign-supported political organization" means a political party or a domestic partnership, association, corporation, organization, or any other combination of persons that has, within the past five (5) calendar years, received money or other things of value from a hostile foreign principal or a representative of a hostile foreign principal and that engages in political activity; (b)  "Hostile foreign nation" means the: (i)  People's Republic of China; (ii)  Russian Federation; (iii)  Democratic People's Republic of Korea; or (iv)  Islamic Republic of Iran. (c)  "Hostile foreign principal" means: (i)  A government of a hostile foreign nation, a political party of a hostile foreign nation, or any member of a political party of a hostile foreign nation; (ii)  A nonresident alien of a hostile foreign nation; or (iii)  A partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other combination of persons organized under the law of or having its principal place of business in a hostile foreign nation. (d)  "Political activity" means an activity that is performed to influence an agency or public official of this state, a local government entity within this state, or the public within this state, with reference to: (i)  Formulating, adopting, or changing the policies or laws of this state; or (ii)  Electing or opposing a candidate for local or state public office, not including campaign donations; and (e) "Representative of a hostile foreign principal" means a person: (i)  Who acts as an agent, employee, representative, or servant, or otherwise acts at the order, request, or under the direction or control of a hostile foreign principal; (ii)  Whose actions are financed in whole or in part by a hostile foreign principal; and (iii) Who engages in political activity. (2)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this act, a person shall not act as a representative of a hostile foreign principal unless the person has filed a true and complete registration statement with the Secretary of State as required by this act. (b)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who becomes a representative of a hostile foreign principal shall file a registration statement under oath with the Secretary of State within ten (10) days of the person's becoming a representative of a hostile foreign principal. (c)  The obligation of a representative of a hostile foreign principal to file a registration statement, after the tenth day of becoming a representative of a hostile foreign principal, shall continue from day to day, and termination of status as a representative of a hostile foreign principal shall not relieve the representative of a hostile foreign principal from the obligation to file a registration statement for the period during which be or she was a representative of a hostile foreign principal. (d)  The registration statement required under this section shall include the registrant's name, principal business address, other business addresses in the United States or residence addresses, if any; and a comprehensive statement of the nature of the registrant's business. (3)  A registered representative of a hostile foreign principal under this act shall update the registration statement required under this act no less than quarterly. (4)  (a)  No later than January 31, 2027, and each following year, each foreign-supported political organization shall register with the Secretary of State and provide the following information: (i)  The name of the foreign-supported political organization, its business address, and upon request, the names, titles, and addresses of all officers and directors of the foreign-supported political organization; (ii)  If the foreign-supported political organization is affiliated with a chapter of a national organization, the name of the national organization, its address, and the names and addresses of its officers and directors; (iii)  A detailed statement of any expenditures of money or other things of value made by the foreign-supported political organization within the prior calendar year to influence an agency or public official of this state, a local government entity within this state, or the public within this state, with reference to formulating, adopting, or changing the policies or laws of this state or electing a candidate to local or state public office; and (iv)  A detailed statement of all money or other thing of value received by the foreign-supported political organization from a hostile foreign principal or a representative of a hostile foreign principal during the prior calendar year. (b)  A foreign-supported political organization under this act shall update the registration statement required under this section no less frequently than annually. (5)  (a)  Upon receipt of a complaint that a representative of a hostile foreign principal or a foreign-supported political organization has failed to comply with the registration and reporting requirements of this act, or upon his or her own determination, the Secretary of State may investigate and assess penalties for the violation of this subchapter. (b)  The Secretary of State may assess the following civil penalties: (i)  For any violation of this act, up to Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per violation; and (ii)  For willful or repeated violations of this act, up to Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per violation. (4)  The Secretary of State shall promulgate rules to: (a)  Create and maintain registration statement forms as described under this subchapter; and (b)  Implement this act. SECTION 2.  Section 23-15-809, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-809.  (a)  In addition to any other reporting required by law, every person who makes independent expenditures in an aggregate amount or value in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) during a calendar year shall file a statement containing the information required under Section 23-15-807.  Such statement shall be filed with the appropriate offices as provided for in Section 23-15-805, and such person shall be considered a political committee for the purpose of determining place of filing. (b)  Statements required to be filed by this subsection shall include: (i)  Information indicating whether the independent expenditure is in support of, or in opposition to, the candidate involved; (ii)  Under penalty of perjury, a certification of whether or not such independent expenditure is made in cooperation, consultation or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, any candidate or any authorized committee or agent of such candidate; and (iii)  The identification of each person who made a contribution in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) to the person filing such statement which was made for the purpose of furthering an independent expenditure. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026